Utah statutes.
32A-2-104 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Delivery of liquor to state stores.

(1)  Liquor to be sold from a state store may be lawfully transported from any warehouse authorized by the department to the state store.   Transportation may be done by any common carrier or other person authorized by the department to transport the liquor to the state store.

(2)  A common carrier or other person, while in or about any vehicle in which liquor is being transported, may not open, break, or allow to be opened or broken, any package containing liquor.   A person may not drink, use, or allow to be drunk or used, any liquor while it is in transit under this section.

